Washington statutes.
RCW 43.334.900

Transfer of powers, duties, and functions.

(1) The office of archaeology and historic preservation is hereby abolished and its powers, duties, and functions are hereby transferred to the department of archaeology and historic preservation.

(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of the office of archaeology and historic preservation shall be delivered to the custody of the department of archaeology and historic preservation. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the office of archaeology and historic preservation shall be made available to the department of archaeology and historic preservation. All funds, credits, or other assets held by the office of archaeology and historic preservation shall be assigned to the department of archaeology and historic preservation.

(b) Any appropriations made to the office of archaeology and historic preservation shall, on July 24, 2005, be transferred and credited to the department of archaeology and historic preservation.

(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(3) All employees of the office of archaeology and historic preservation are transferred to the jurisdiction of the department of archaeology and historic preservation. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the department of archaeology and historic preservation to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service.

(4) All rules and all pending business before the office of archaeology and historic preservation shall be continued and acted upon by the department of archaeology and historic preservation. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the department of archaeology and historic preservation.

(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the office of archaeology and historic preservation shall not affect the validity of any act performed before July 24, 2005.

(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this section, the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.

(7) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the personnel resources board as provided by law.

[ 2005 c 333 s 12.]